California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 68.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.6.

(a) Before granting a certificate of authority or amended certificate of authority as a grants and annuities society to any applicant, the commissioner shall consider the qualifications of the applicant with respect to the following subjects:

(1) Minimum net worth and working capital.

(2) Lawfulness and quality of investments.

(3) Financial stability.

(4) Reinsurance agreements.

(5) Competency, character, and integrity of management.

(6) Ownership and control.

(7) Fairness and honesty of methods of doing business.

(8) Risk to the public.

(b) Upon consideration of all relevant qualifications, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to an applicant, unless the commissioner finds that the applicant is materially deficient with respect to one or more of the subjects set forth in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.

Upon granting to such organization or person a certificate of authority to receive such transfers, the commissioner shall require it to establish and maintain a reserve fund adequate to meet the future payments under its outstanding annuity contracts and in any event not less than an amount computed as follows:

(a) In the case of annuities payable under agreements made prior to January 1, 1950, in accordance with the standard of valuation based upon McClintock’s table of mortality among annuitants, with interest assumption at 312 percent per annum.

(b) In the case of annuities payable under agreements made on and after January 1, 1950, in accordance with the standard of valuation based upon the 1937 Standard Annuity Table, with interest assumption at 212 percent per annum, or other table of mortality derived from recent annuity experience, with interest assumption not higher than is currently yielded on safe securities, as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

For any failure on its part to establish and maintain such reserve fund, the commissioner shall revoke its certificate of authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 338.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.1.

(a) The funds and other property, together with interest and dividends thereon and proceeds therefrom, conditioned upon issuance of the certificate holder’s contracts to pay annuities, shall be maintained under a separate trust agreement for reserves held for the benefit of California annuitants and shall be held legally and physically segregated from the other assets of the certificate holder. The amendments to this subdivision enacted during the 1993 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session shall apply to any organization that is issued a new certificate of authority on or after January 1, 1994. Any grants and annuities society that holds a certificate of authority on January 1, 1994, and that is not in compliance with this subdivision as of that date, shall comply with these amendments by January 1, 1998.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prevent the certificate holder from withdrawing from time to time, pursuant to an appropriate resolution of its board of trustees, that amount or amounts as are determined, in a manner which is satisfactory to the commissioner, to be excess over and above its reserve required to be maintained under the provisions of Section 11521.

(c) If the grants and annuities society will manage and direct investment of the reserve funds required under Section 11521, the California reserves may be held under a declaration of trust stating that the grants and annuities society will hold the funds in trust and invest funds or property held in trust in accordance with the requirements of this code. If a bank will manage or direct the investment of the California reserves fund, a trust agreement shall be executed with that institution that will act as a trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 225, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.2.

(a) The reserve required by the table of commensurate values for each annuity contract issued must be invested in investments specified in Sections 1170 through 1182 except that a certificate holder may invest in investment companies registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, and in securities, including interests in those investment companies, listed and traded on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange or regional stock exchanges or the National Market System of the Nasdaq Stock Market or successors to such exchanges or market having the same qualifications, to the extent of the lesser of net worth (assets over liabilities and reserves) of the certificate holder or 50 percent of these general investments. This section does not permit investment in options or commodity exchanges.

(b) The certificate holder may invest in other investments as permitted by and subject to the written consent of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.3.

(a) Prior to admission each applicant shall file with the commissioner an accurate and complete financial statement consisting of a balance sheet and income and expense statement, showing the current condition of the applicant and sworn to by the officer of the applicant having the responsibility for preparing the statement.

(b) If the applicant is already transacting a grants and annuities business in another state, an accurate and complete financial statement showing the condition of the present grants and annuities business, sworn to by the officer having the responsibility for preparing the statement, shall be submitted.

(c) One hundred and twenty days after the end of their fiscal year, every certificate holder, except a certificate holder that also holds a certificate of authority pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, shall make and file with the commissioner an accurate and complete financial statement, consisting of a balance sheet and income and expense statement, showing the current condition of the certificate holder’s grants and annuities operation on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 173, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.4.

The commissioner may, in his discretion and after hearing, require the disposal of any investment made in violation of the provisions of this chapter; pending disposal pursuant to such order, no value shall be allowed for such investment in any financial statement or report required to be filed with the commissioner and purporting to show the financial condition of the owner thereof for the purpose of determining whether such owner is solvent or insolvent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.5.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Pursuant to these provisions, the commissioner may also amend or repeal the rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.6.

Nothing contained in Section 11521, 11521.1, 11521.2, 11521.4, 11523.6, or paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11523 shall apply to any grants and annuities certificate holder that also holds a certificate of authority pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. A grants and annuities certificate holder subject to this section shall display clearly and conspicuously, and in the type specified, the disclosure required by paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 11523 in all agreements issued under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11522.

Every organization or person holding a certificate of authority to receive transfers under this chapter shall make and file with the commissioner information regarding each agreement entered into between the permit or certificate holder and the transferor. The information requested by the commissioner shall be provided in the number, form, and format, at the intervals, and by the methods prescribed by the commissioner. The organization or person shall pay a basic fee to the commissioner for the filing of the requested information. The basic fee as provided in this section shall be established by rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to Section 11521.5 for information filed by the organization or person where information is filed regarding up to 10 agreements within any calendar quarter. Thereafter, within each calendar quarter, the fee for information filed regarding each agreement shall be as follows: 50 percent of the basic fee for information filed regarding 11 to 20 agreements filed; 20 percent of the basic fee for information filed regarding 21 to 30 agreements filed; 10 percent of the basic fee for information filed regarding 31 to 40 agreements filed; and 5 percent of the basic filing fee for information filed regarding 41 or more agreements.

The fees as provided herein shall be paid with the filing of the information regarding the agreements by the organization or person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.

(a) The annuity agreement shall show each of the following:

(1) The value of the property transferred.

(2) The amount of annuity agreed to be paid to the transferor or his nominee.

(3) The manner in which, and the intervals at which, the annuity is to be paid.

(4) The age, in years, at or nearest the date of the agreement, of the person during whose life the annuity is to be paid.

(5) The effective date of the agreement.

(6) The signature of each donor.

(7) The following clause, in at least 12-point boldface type, located on the same page as and in the immediate proximity of the donor signature line: “Annuities are subject to regulation by the State of California. Payments under this agreement, however, are not protected or otherwise guaranteed by any government agency or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association.

(b) Every organization or person holding a certificate of authority to receive transfers under this chapter shall annually certify to the commissioner that all agreements entered into during the time period covered by the certification show all of the information set forth in subdivision (a). The certification shall be in the number, form, and format, by the method, and at the time prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may from time to time as he or she deems necessary require that a copy of each agreement be submitted to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 253, Sec. 4.   Effective September 22, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.5.

Any person holding a certificate of authority under this chapter may reinsure its total liability under an annuity agreement (as defined in Section 11523) with an admitted insurer for a single premium. In such event, such certificate holder may take credit for such reinsurance in reduction of the amount of the reserve fund it is required to maintain under the provisions of Section 11521, subject to the following conditions:

(a) Such certificate holder shall file with the commissioner a copy of the reinsurance contract specifying which annuity agreement previously filed pursuant to Section 11522 is thereby reinsured.

(b) Such certificate holder shall enter into a written agreement with the annuitant and the reinsurer agreeing that if it should for any reason be unable to continue the making of the annuity payments required by its annuity agreement, the annuitant shall receive payments directly from the reinsurer and that such reinsurer shall be credited with all such direct payments in the accounts between it and such reinsurer.

(c) Any commission granted by the reinsurer on the reinsurance shall be payable only to the certificate holder which shall pay no commission directly or on account of such reinsurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.6.

No grants and annuities society applying for admission to this state, or transacting in this state, the business described in this chapter shall transact or be authorized to transact a variable annuity business as described in Section 10506.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11524.

Except as prescribed in this chapter, such organization or person shall be otherwise exempt from the provisions of this code and other insurance laws of this state, except the provisions of Sections 730 to 736, inclusive, Sections 790 to 790.10, inclusive, Section 1011, Sections 1012 to 1044, and Sections 1056.5 to 1061. The cost and expense of examining such organization or person shall be paid as prescribed in Section 736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 209, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Voluntary Mutualization of Incorporated Life and Life and Disability Insurers Having a Capital Stock and Issuing Nonassessable Policies on a Reserve Basis [11525. - 11533.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authority and Requirements to Mutualize [11525. - 11528.]

11525.

A solvent domestic incorporated insurer having a paid-in capital represented by outstanding shares of capital stock and issuing, on a reserve basis, nonassessable policies of life insurance or of both life and disability insurance, may convert itself into an incorporated mutual life insurer, or life and disability insurer, issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis. To that end it may provide and carry out a plan for the acquisition of the outstanding shares of its capital stock for the benefit of its policyholders, or any class or classes of its policyholders, by complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

11526.

Such plan shall include appropriate proceedings for amending the insurer’s articles of incorporation to give effect to the acquisition, by said insurer, for the benefit of its policyholders or any class or classes thereof, of the outstanding shares of its capital stock and the conversion of the insurer from a stock corporation into a nonstock corporation for the benefit of its members. The members of such nonstock corporation shall be the policyholders from time to time of the class or classes for whose benefit the stock of the insurer was acquired, and the policyholders of such other class or classes as may be specified in such corporation’s articles of incorporation as they may be amended from time to time. Such plan shall be:

(a) Adopted by a vote of a majority of the directors.

(b) Approved by the vote of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares at a special meeting of shareholders called for that purpose, or by the written consent of such shareholders.

(c) Submitted to the commissioner and approved by him in writing.

(d) Approved by a majority vote of all the policyholders of the class or classes for whose benefit the stock is to be acquired voting at an election by the policyholders called for that purpose, subject to the provisions of Section 11528. The terms “policyholder” and “policyholders” as used in this chapter shall be deemed to mean the person or persons insured under an individual policy of life insurance, or of disability insurance, or of any combination of life and disability insurance. They shall also include the person or persons to whom any annuity or pure endowment is presently or prospectively payable by the terms of an individual annuity or pure endowment contract, except where the policy or contract declares some other person to be the owner or holder thereof, in which case such other person shall be deemed the policyholder. In any case where such policy or contract names two or more persons as joint insureds, payees, owners or holders thereof, the persons so named shall be deemed collectively to be but one policyholder for the purpose of this chapter. In any case where a policy or contract shall have been assigned by assignment absolute on its face to an assignee other than the insurer, and such assignment shall have been filed at the principal office of the insurer at least 30 days prior to the date of any election or meeting referred to in this chapter, then such assignee shall be deemed at such election or meeting to be the policyholder. For the purpose of this chapter the terms “policyholder” and “policyholders” include the employer to whom, or a president, secretary or other executive officer of any corporation or association to which a master group policy has been issued, but exclude the holders of certificates or policies issued under or in connection with a master group policy. Beneficiaries under unmatured contracts shall not as such be deemed to be policyholders.

(e) Filed in the office of the Insurance Commissioner after having been approved as provided in subdivisions (b), (c) and (d) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

11527.

The commissioner shall examine the plan submitted under subdivision (c) of Section 11526. The commissioner shall not approve the plan unless in the commissioner’s opinion the rights and interests of the insurer, its policyholders, and shareholders are protected and the commissioner is satisfied that the plan will be fair and equitable in its operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

11528.

The election prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 11526, shall be called by the board of directors or the president and every policyholder of the class or classes for whose benefit the stock is to be acquired, whose insurance shall have been in force for at least one year prior to the election shall have one vote, regardless of the number of policies or amount of insurance the policyholder holds, and regardless of whether the policies are policies of life insurance or policies of disability insurance. Notice of the election shall be given to policyholders entitled to vote by mail from the principal office of the insurer at least 30 days prior to the date set for the election, in a sealed envelope, postage prepaid, addressed to the policyholder at that person’s last known address.

Voting shall be by one of the following methods:

(a) At a meeting of those policyholders, held pursuant to the notice, by ballot in person or by proxy.

(b) If not by the method described in subdivision (a), then by mail pursuant to a procedure and on forms to be prescribed by the plan.

The election shall be conducted under the direction and supervision of three impartial and disinterested inspectors appointed by the insurer and approved by the commissioner. In case any person appointed as inspector fails to appear at the meeting or fails or refuses to act at the election, the vacancy, if occurring in advance of the convening of the meeting or in advance of the opening of the mail vote, may be filled in the manner prescribed for the appointment of inspectors and, if occurring at the meeting or during the canvass of the mail vote, may be filled by the person acting as chairperson of the meeting or designated for that purpose in the plan. The decision, act, or certificate of a majority of the inspectors shall be effective in all respects as the decision, act, or certificate of all. The inspectors of election shall determine the number of policyholders, the voting power of each, the policyholders represented at the meeting or voting by mail, the existence of a quorum, and the authenticity, validity, and effect of proxies. They shall receive votes, hear and determine all challenges and questions in any way arising in connection with the right to vote, count and tabulate all votes, determine the result, and do such other acts as are proper to conduct the vote with fairness to all policyholders. The inspectors of election shall, before commencing performance of their duties, subscribe to and file with the insurer and with the commissioner an oath that they, and each of them, will perform their duties impartially, in good faith, to the best of their ability and as expeditiously as is practicable. On the request of the insurer, the commissioner, a policyholder or his or her proxy, the inspectors shall make a report in writing of any challenge or question or matter determined by them and execute a certificate of any fact found by them. They shall also certify the result of the vote to the insurer and to the commissioner. Any report or certificate made by them shall be prima facie evidence of facts stated therein. All necessary expenses incurred in connection with the election shall be paid by the insurer. For the purpose of this section, a quorum shall consist of 5 percent of the policyholders of the insurer entitled to vote at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Execution of Plan [11529. - 11533.]

11529.

In carrying out any such plan, the insurer may acquire any shares of its own stock by gift, bequest or purchase. Any shares so acquired shall, unless as a result of such acquisition all of the shares of the insurer shall have been acquired, be acquired in trust for the policyholders of the class or classes for whose benefit the plan provides that the stock of the insurer shall be acquired as hereinafter provided. Such shares shall be assigned and transferred on the books of such insurer to three or more trustees appointed by the insurer and approved by the commissioner under a trust agreement approved by the commissioner. Such trustees shall hold such stock in trust until all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of such insurer have been acquired, but for not longer than 30 years with such extensions of not more than five years each as may be granted by the commissioner. Such extensions may be granted by the commissioner if the plan so provides and if in his opinion the plan of acquisition of all of such stock can be completed within a reasonable period. Such trustees shall vote such stock at all corporate meetings at which stockholders have the right to vote. When all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of such insurer have been acquired, all said shares shall be canceled, the certificate of amendment of the insurer’s articles of incorporation giving effect thereto shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1, of the Corporations Code, and the insurer shall become a nonstock corporation for the profit of its members and such trust shall thereupon terminate. Thereafter such corporation shall be conducted for the mutual benefit, ratably, of its policyholders of the class or classes for whose benefit the stock was acquired and shall have power to issue nonassessable policies on a reserve basis subject to all provisions of law applicable to incorporated life insurers or life and disability insurers, as the case may be, issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis. Policies so issued may be upon the basis of full or partial participation therein as agreed between the insurer and the insured.

Upon the termination of any such voting trusts, either in accordance with its terms or as hereinabove provided, such plan of mutualization shall terminate, unless theretofore completed. Upon such termination, unless the plan of mutualization provides for the disposition of the shares acquired by the insurer under such plan or for the disposition of the proceeds thereof, the shares held by such trustees shall be disposed of in accordance with an order of the superior court of the county in which is located the principal office of such insurer, made upon a verified application of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

11529.5.

Any such plan of mutualization may provide for the creation of a voting trust under a trust agreement for the holding and voting by three or more trustees of any portion or all of the shares of the insurer not acquired upon the adoption of such plan. The voting trustees shall be named in accordance with such plan or, if no provision is made therein for the naming of such trustees, then by the insurer. The voting trust agreement and voting trustees shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner. Any or all of the trustees under such voting trust agreement may be the same person or persons as any or all of the trustees referred to in Section 11529. Such voting trust agreement shall provide that in the event of acquisition by the insurer of any of the shares of stock held thereunder in accordance with the provisions of the plan, such shares so acquired together with the voting rights thereof shall be transferred by the trustees named under the provisions of this section to the trustees named under the provisions of Section 11529. Any voting trust agreement created pursuant to the provisions of this section may be made irrevocable for not longer than thirty (30) years and thereafter until the termination of the trust provided for in Section 11529. The trust created pursuant to the provisions of this section shall terminate in any event upon termination of the trust provided for in Section 11529. Upon the termination of the trust created pursuant to the provision of this section, any shares held in such trust shall revert to the persons entitled thereto by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

11530.

Every payment for the acquisition of any shares of the capital stock of such insurer, the purchase price of which is not fixed by such plan, shall be subject to the prior approval of the commissioner. Neither such plan, nor any such payment, may be approved by the commissioner unless he finds that the rights and interests of the insurer, its policyholders, and shareholders are protected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

11531.

The trustees referred to in section 11529 shall file with such insurer and with the commissioner a verified acceptance of their appointments and verified declarations that they will faithfully discharge their duties as such trustees. All dividends and other sums received by said trustees on the shares held by them, after paying the necessary expenses of executing their trust, shall be immediately repaid to such insurer for the benefit of all who are, or may become, policyholders of such insurer of the class or classes for whose benefit the stock of such insurer was acquired and entitled to participate in the profits thereof and shall be added to and become a part of the assets of such insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.

Such insurer, after mutualization, shall be a continuation of the original insurer, and such mutualization shall not affect such insurer’s certificate of authority nor existing suits, rights or contracts except as provided in said plan for the acquisition of the outstanding shares of the capital stock of such insurer, approved as provided in this chapter. Such insurer, after mutualization, shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties conferred or imposed by law upon insurers writing the classes of insurance written by it, and to protect rights and contracts existing prior to mutualization, subject to the effect of said plan. The board of directors of such insurer, prior to mutualization, may adopt amendments to its bylaws to take effect upon mutualization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.1.

An annual meeting of members shall be held at 10 o'clock in the morning of the fourth Tuesday of March of each year at the principal office of the insurer, unless a different time or place be provided in the by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.2.

Special meetings of the members, for any purpose or purposes whatsoever, may be called at any time by the president, or by the board of directors, or by one or more members holding not less than one-fifth of the voting power of such insurer, or by such other officers or persons as the by-laws authorize.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.3.

Notice of all meetings of members whether annual or special shall be given in writing to the members entitled to vote by the secretary, or an assistant secretary, or other person charged with that duty, or if there be no such officer, or in case of his neglect or refusal, by any director or member. At the option of the insurer such notice may be imprinted on premium notices or receipts or on both.

A notice may be given by such insurer to any member either personally, or by mail, or other means of written communication, charges prepaid, addressed to such member at his address appearing on the books of the insurer, or given by him to the insurer for the purpose of notice. If a member gives no address, notice shall be deemed to have been given him if sent by mail or other means of written communication addressed to the place where the principal office of the insurer is situated, or if published at least once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which said office is located.

Notice of any meeting of members shall be sent to each member entitled thereto not less than seven days before such meeting, unless the bylaws provide otherwise.

Notice of any meeting of members shall specify the place, the day, and the hour of the meeting and the general nature of the business to be transacted.

Notice of an annual meeting to be held at the time and place specified in Section 11532.1 shall be sufficiently given if published at least once in each of four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of such insurer is located, and if so published no other notice of such meeting shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.4.

The presence in person or by proxy of 5 per cent of the members entitled to vote at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless otherwise provided in the by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.5.

Each such member shall have one vote at any meeting of members regardless of the number of policies or the amount of insurance that such member holds and regardless of whether such policies are policies of life insurance, or of disability insurance, or both. Any member entitled to vote shall have the right to do so either in person or by an agent or agents authorized by a written proxy executed by such person or his duly authorized agent and filed with the secretary of such insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.6.

The directors of the insurer in office at the time the insurer is mutualized as provided in this chapter shall continue in office until the first annual meeting of members. At the first annual meeting of members and at each annual meeting thereafter directors shall be elected by the members for the term or terms authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.7.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that the directors may be divided into two or more classes whose terms of office shall expire at different times, but no term shall continue longer than six years. In the absence of such provisions, each director, except members of the board of directors at the time the insurer is mutualized, shall be elected for a term of one year. All directors shall hold office for the term for which they are elected and until their successors are elected and qualified. A director may, but need not be a member or policyholder of the insurer of which he is acting as director. Vacancies in the board of directors may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum, and each director so elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.8.

All insurers mutualized under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to all other applicable provisions of this code and to the provisions of the general corporation law as provided in Section 1140 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

11533.

The provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Shares of the capital stock of such insurer acquired as provided in section 11529 and assigned and transferred to the trustees as is provided in said section, and the assignment and transfer of said shares as so provided.

(b) Any certificate or other instrument issued to a policyholder of such mutualized insurer conferring or evidencing membership in such mutualized insurer or conferring or evidencing such member’s right to participate in the profits or share in the assets of such mutualized insurer by virtue of his membership therein, and the issuance of such certificate or other instrument.

(c) The plan for the acquisition of the outstanding shares of the capital stock of such insurer authorized by the provisions of this chapter, the submission of said plan to the commissioner and to the policyholders of such insurer as provided in this chapter, and the approval and carrying out of said plan or any part thereof in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 530.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Conversion of an Incorporated Mutual Life or Life and Disability Insurer into an Incorporated Stock Life Insurer Issuing Policies on a Reserve Basis [11535. - 11549.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authority and Requirements to Convert [11535. - 11549.]

11535.

(a) A domestic incorporated mutual life insurer, or life and disability insurer, issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis may be converted into an incorporated stock life or stock life and disability insurer issuing, on a reserve basis, nonassessable policies of life insurance or of both life and disability insurance. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) A domestic incorporated mutual insurer not referred to in subdivision (a) and that is not a medical malpractice mutual insurer as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 4097.01, which may be referred to in this chapter as a mutual property-casualty insurer, may be converted into an incorporated stock property-casualty insurer. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this chapter. A medical malpractice mutual insurer as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 4097.01 may not convert to a stock insurer under this chapter.

(c) A mutual holding company may be converted into a stock corporation. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(d) As part of the conversion authorized in this section, a domestic incorporated mutual insurer may merge with an incorporated stock insurer, if the merging insurers comply with the provisions of this code applicable to their participation in the merger, or may transfer its domicile to any other state, if the insurer complies with Section 709.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11535.1.

The definitions in this section apply to the following terms when used in this chapter.

(a) “Adoption date” means the date the board of directors adopts the plan of conversion.

(b) “Converted company” means the converted insurer or converted mutual holding company, as the case may be.

(c) “Converted insurer” means the incorporated stock insurer into which a mutual insurer has been converted or merged or redomiciled in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(d) “Converted mutual holding company” means the stock corporation into which a mutual holding company has been converted in accordance with this chapter.

(e) “Converting mutual life company” means, for a plan of conversion under this chapter, the mutual life insurer or mutual holding company that is converting under such a plan.

(f) “Effective date” means, for the conversion of a mutual life insurer, the date upon which the conversion of the mutual life insurer is effective, as specified in the commissioner’s amendment to the mutual life insurer’s certificate of authority issued in accordance with Section 11542, as a result of conversion proceedings under this chapter. For the conversion of a mutual holding company, “effective date” means the date upon which the conversion of a mutual holding company is effective, as specified in the amended articles of incorporation of the mutual holding company filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 11542, as a result of conversion proceedings under this chapter.

(g) “Eligible members” means, for the conversion of a mutual life insurer, the members of the mutual life insurer who are of record on the mutual life insurer’s adoption date. For the conversion of a mutual holding company, “eligible members” means the members of the mutual holding company who are of record on the mutual holding company’s adoption date.

(h) “Member” means a person who, by the records of the mutual company and by its articles of incorporation or bylaws, is deemed to be a holder of a membership interest in the mutual company. For a mutual life insurer, a plan of conversion may provide that the term “member” also includes a person who is the owner of a policy issued or assumed by an insurer, that, pursuant to court order, is to be merged into the converted company. On and after the effective date of a plan of conversion that creates a mutual holding company, the term “member” means a member of a mutual holding company, as provided in Section 11542.1.

(i) “Membership interests” means the interests of members arising under this code and the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the mutual company or otherwise by law. Membership interests include the right to vote for directors of the mutual company and the right to vote on any plan of merger, consolidation, reinsurance, or transfer of assets and liabilities of the mutual company. Membership interests do not include members’ rights in surplus, if any.
